Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-953
State colleges; research activities permitted.

The state colleges may continue to pursue and develop applied research programs related to their instructional and regional responsibilities. Research activities of the state colleges shall be directly related to the enhancement of the instructional programs and to the professional development of the faculty.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 37;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 97.